Utah statutes.
57-14-205.   Person using land of another not relieved from duty to exercise care.

This part may not be construed to relieve any person, using the land of another for recreational purposes, from any obligation which the person may have in the absence of this chapter to exercise care in use of the land and in activities on the land, or from the legal consequences of failure to employ care.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2013 General Session

